Tennessee, session 114, HB1026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101(g)(1)(A), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
( ) Section 39-16-402 – Official misconduct;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1026
000725
- 1 -